New York, session 2025-2026, A2601.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (vi) of paragraph (k) of subdivision 3 of 2 section 160.50 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by chapter 92 3 of the laws of 2021, is amended and a new subparagraph (vii) is added to 4 read as follows: 5 (vi) the conviction was for an offense defined in section 222.10, 6 222.15, 222.25 or 222.45 of the penal law[.]; or 7 (vii) the conviction was for a violation of an offense defined in 8 former section 220.45 of the penal law prior to the effective date of 9 this subparagraph. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 11 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00061-01-5